tr: Ekran rengi modu: Siyah ve beyaz; Renk; Diğer
en: Display color mode: Black & white; Color; Other
pt-PT: Modo de cor de exibição: Preto e branco; Cor; Outro
ja: ディスプレイの色モード: 白黒; 色; その他
da: Skærmfarvetilstand: Sort/hvid; Farve; Andet
pl: Tryb koloru wyświetlacza: Czarno-białe; Kolor; Inne
sv: Skärmfärgläge: Svart vit; Färg; Övrigt
th: แสดงโหมดสี: ขาวดำ; สี; อื่นๆ
nb: Fargemodus for skjerm: Svart-hvitt; Farge; Annet
nl: Kleurmodus display: Zwart-wit; Kleur; Andere
pt-BR: Modo de exibição de cores: Preto e branco; Cor; Outro
ru: Режим отображения цветов: Черно-белый; Цветной; Другой
hr-HR: Način prikaza boja zaslona: Crno-bijelo; Boja; Ostalo
zh-TW: 顯示顏色模式: 黑白; 顏色; 其他
fi: Näytön väritila: Mustavalkoinen; Väri; Muu
cs: Barevný režim displeje: Černobílý; Barva; Jiné
sl-SI: Barvni način zaslona: Črno-belo; Barvno; Drugo
el: Λειτουργία χρώματος της οθόνης: Ασπρόμαυρος; Χρώμα; Άλλο
zh-CN: 显示颜色模式: 黑白; 颜色; 其他
lt-LT: Ekrano spalvinis režimas: Nespalvota; Spalvota; Kita
bg-BG: Цветен режим на дисплея: Чернобял; Цветен; Други
vi: Chế độ hiển thị màu: Đen trắng; Màu; Khác
ko: 디스플레이 색상 모드: 흑백; 색상; 기타
de: Farbmodus des Displays: Schwarz-Weiß; Farbe; Sonstiges
ro-RO: Mod afișaj culoare: Alb și negru; Color; Altele
hu: Színmegjelenítési mód: Fekete-fehér; Színes; Egyéb
it: Modalità del colore del display: Bianco e nero; Color; Altro
es: Modo de color de pantalla: Blanco y negro; Color; Otros
sk-SK: Farebný režim zobrazenia: Čierno-biely; Farba; Iné
fr: Mode couleur d’affichage: Noir et blanc; Couleur; Autre